Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,128
Criminal detention facilities; minimum construction standards.

The minimum standards for the construction of criminal detention facilities shall include but not be limited to standards for the planning, design, or actual construction of new, modified, or renovated facilities, in excess of five thousand dollars.

Laws 1978, LB 212, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 83-948.02.